Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2163.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-928, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-928. Applicability of lighting laws The sections of this article, including sections 28-929, through 28-930, 28-931, 28-932, 28-933 and 28-934, relating to clearance and marker lamps, reflectors and stoplights, apply as stated in those sections to vehicles of the type enumerated in the sections, namely passenger buses, trucks, truck tractors and certain trailers, semitrailers and pole trailers, respectively, when operated on a highway and to implements of husbandry and construction equipment that are INCIDENTALLY operated or moved on a highway. These vehicles shall be equipped as required and all lamp equipment required shall be lighted at the times mentioned in section 28-922, except that clearance and side marker lamps need not be lighted on a vehicle when operated within any municipality where there is sufficient light to render clearly discernible persons and vehicles on the highway at a distance of five hundred feet.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 28-929, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-929. Additional lighting equipment required on certain vehicles In addition to other equipment required in this article, the following vehicles shall be equipped with the following equipment under the conditions stated in section 28-928: 1. On a bus or truck regardless of size, on the rear, two reflectors, one at each side, and two stoplights. 2. On a bus or truck eighty inches or more in overall width, in addition to the requirements in paragraph 1 of this section: (a) On the front, two clearance lamps, one at each side. (b) On the rear, two clearance lamps, one at each side. (c) On each side, two side marker lamps, one at or near the front and one at or near the rear. Vehicles that exceed thirty feet in length shall have a third side marker lamp on each side at the midpoint between the front and rear marker lamps. (d) On each side, two reflectors, one at or near the front and one at or near the rear. Vehicles that exceed thirty feet in length shall have a third reflector on each side at the midpoint between the front and rear reflectors. 3. On a truck tractor: (a) On the front, two clearance lamps, one at each side. (b) On the rear, two stoplights. 4. On a trailer or semitrailer with a gross weight of more than three thousand pounds: (a) On the front, two clearance lamps, one at each side. (b) On each side, two side marker lamps, one at or near the front and one at or near the rear. Vehicles that exceed thirty feet in length shall have a third side marker lamp on each side at the midpoint between the front and rear marker lamps. (c) On each side, two reflectors, one at or near the front and one at or near the rear. Vehicles that exceed thirty feet in length shall have a third reflector on each side at the midpoint between the front and rear reflectors. (d) On the rear, two clearance lamps, one at each side, and two reflectors, one at each side, and two stoplights. 5. On a pole trailer with a gross weight of more than three thousand pounds: (a) On each side, one side marker lamp and one clearance lamp that may be in combination, to show to the front, side and rear. (b) On the rear of the pole trailer or load, two reflectors, one at each side. 6. On a trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer with a gross weight of three thousand pounds or less: (a) On the rear, two reflectors, one on each side. (b) Two stoplights on a trailer or semitrailer if it is loaded in such a manner or is of such dimensions as to obscure the stoplight on the towing vehicle. 7. On an implement of husbandry or on construction equipment that is INCIDENTALLY operated or moved on a highway: (a) on the rear, two strobe lights that may be attached by a MAGNET. (b) On each side, one strobe light that may be attached by a magnet.END_STATUTE